Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-1486
Rental deposit; failure to provide written statement; effect.

A landlord who fails to provide a written statement as required by section 76-1485 shall forfeit all rights to withhold any portion of the rental deposit.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 37;

Laws 2021, LB320, § 11.